Utah statutes.
9-4-202.   Powers and duties of division.
(1)  The division shall:
(a)  assist local governments and citizens in the planning, development, and
maintenance of necessary public infrastructure and services;
(b)  cooperate with, and provide technical assistance to, counties, cities,
towns, regional planning commissions, area-wide clearinghouses, zoning
commissions, parks or recreation boards, community development groups,
community action agencies, and other agencies created for the purpose of
aiding and encouraging an orderly, productive, and coordinated development of
the state and its political subdivisions;
(c)  assist the governor in coordinating the activities of state agencies
which have an impact on the solution of community development problems and the
implementation of community plans;
(d)  serve as a clearinghouse for information, data, and other materials which
may be helpful to local governments in discharging their responsibilities and
provide information on available federal and state financial and technical
assistance;
(e)  carry out continuing studies and analyses of the problems faced by
communities within the state and develop such recommendations for
administrative or legislative action as appear necessary;
(f)  assist in funding affordable housing and addressing problems of
homelessness;
(g)  support economic development activities through grants, loans, and direct
programs financial assistance;
(h)  certify project funding at the local level in conformance with federal,
state, and other requirements;
(i)  utilize the capabilities and facilities of public and private
universities and colleges within the state in carrying out its functions;
(j)  assist and support local governments, community action agencies, and
citizens in the planning, development, and maintenance of home weatherization,
energy efficiency, and antipoverty activities; and
(k)  assist and support volunteer efforts in the state.
(2)  The division may:
(a)  by following the procedures and requirements of Title 63J, Chapter 5,
Federal Funds Procedures Act, seek federal grants, loans, or participation in
federal programs;
(b)  if any federal program requires the expenditure of state funds as a
condition to participation by the state in any fund, property, or service,
with the governor's approval, expend whatever funds are necessary out of the
money provided by the Legislature for the use of the department;
(c)  in accordance with Part 13, Domestic Violence Shelters, assist in
developing, constructing, and improving shelters for victims of domestic
violence, as described in Section 77-36-1, through loans and grants to
nonprofit and governmental entities; and
(d)  assist, when requested by a county or municipality, in the development of
accessible housing.
(3) (a)  The division is recognized as an issuing authority as defined in
Subsection 9-4-502(7), entitled to issue bonds from the Small Issue Bond
Account created in Subsection 9-4-506(1)(c) as a part of the state's private
activity bond volume cap authorized by the Internal Revenue Code of 1986 and
computed under Section 146 of the code.
(b)  To promote and encourage the issuance of bonds from the Small Issue Bond
Account for manufacturing projects, the division may:
(i)  develop campaigns and materials that inform qualified small manufacturing
businesses about the existence of the program and the application process;
(ii)  assist small businesses in applying for and qualifying for these bonds;
or
(iii)  develop strategies to lower the cost to small businesses of applying
for and qualifying for these bonds, including making arrangements with
financial advisors, underwriters, bond counsel, and other professionals
involved in the issuance process to provide their services at a reduced rate
when the division can provide them with a high volume of applicants or issues.
